dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="nieb/o__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stop/ień__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ień</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ień</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niowi</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niem</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ni</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niom</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niach</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niami</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>ień<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="typ__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ie</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="śr/oda__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>oda</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odę</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ody</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odzie</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odzie</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odą</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odo</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ody</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ody</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ód</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odom</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odach</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>odami</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ody</l><r>oda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stycz/eń__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>eń</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eń</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nia</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niowi</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niem</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niu</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niów/styczni</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niom</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niach</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>niami</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nie</l><r>eń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ambulans"><i>ambulans</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="drzewo"><i>drzew</i><par n="nieb/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ekran"><i>ekran</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="faks"><i>faks</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="grab"><i>grab</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="hormon"><i>hormon</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="huragan"><i>huragan</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="jesion"><i>jesion</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="klon"><i>klon</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="kompromis"><i>kompromis</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="krzew"><i>krzew</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="mięso"><i>mięs</i><par n="nieb/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="modem"><i>modem</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="neon"><i>neon</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="niebo"><i>nieb</i><par n="nieb/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="paragon"><i>paragon</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="pluton"><i>pluton</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="problem"><i>problem</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="proton"><i>proton</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="sejsmograf"><i>sejsmograf</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="stopień"><i>stop</i><par n="stop/ień__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="styczeń"><i>stycz</i><par n="stycz/eń__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="synonim"><i>synonim</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="sześcian"><i>sześcian</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="telefon"><i>telefon</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="trolejbus"><i>trolejbus</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="tron"><i>tron</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="typ"><i>typ</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wagon"><i>wagon</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wulkan"><i>wulkan</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="ślub"><i>ślub</i><par n="typ__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="środa"><i>śr</i><par n="śr/oda__n_f"/></e>
